California, session 20252026, AB2026.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Climate change is increasing water scarcity in California.(b) The state must prepare for more frequent and severe droughts.(c) The state must invest in infrastructure and have processes in place to manage floods.(d) California’s underground aquifers contain a vast amount of natural water storage capacity.(e) Underground water storage is a faster, more cost-effective, and environmentally sustainable water storage alternative to new surface water reservoirs.(f) Diversions to groundwater recharge can also help with flood control.(g) Since at least 2014, with the passage of the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act, it has been the intent of the Legislature to increase groundwater storage and remove impediments to groundwater recharge.(h) After 2014, the Legislature passed three measures to help facilitate groundwater recharge. The measures authorize the State Water Resources Control Board to issue temporary permits to divert surface water for the purpose of underground storage, authorize the diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge without an appropriative water right if certain conditions are met, and require the California Water Plan to prioritize actions to increase groundwater recharge throughout California.(i) Despite the legislative actions described in subdivision (h), and despite wet hydrology throughout California in the intervening years, groundwater recharge is not occurring on the pace and scale required to meaningfully improve water supply reliability and provide reliable mechanisms for flood control.(j) Additional changes in law are required to improve the process for permitted groundwater recharge and to expand the ability for unpermitted diversion of floodflows, while protecting existing water rights and the environmental needs of California’s fish and wildlife.SEC. 2. Section 1242.1 of the Water Code is amended to read:1242.1. The diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge shall not require an appropriative water right if all of the following conditions are met:(a) (1) A local or regional agency responsible for flood management has given notice via its internet website, electronic distribution list, emergency notification service, or another means of public notice, that floodflows exist and, additionally, that floodflows downstream of the point of diversion are at imminent risk of flooding and inundation of land, roads, or structures.(2) As used in this section, “floodflow” means any of the following:(A) Where a water body is subject to a defined flood stage, flows in excess of flood stage where actions are necessary to avoid threats to human health and safety.(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), where a water body is not subject to a defined flood stage, surface water escaped from or is likely to imminently escape from a channel or water body causing or threatening to cause inundation of residential or commercial structures, or roads needed for emergency response. Likely imminent escape from a channel or water body shall be demonstrated by measured flows in excess of the maximum design capacity of a flood control project, where such a project is present and the maximum design capacity is readily available information.(ii) This subparagraph does not apply to flows that inundate wetlands, working lands, or floodplains, events that constitute a “design flood,” groundwater seepage, or waters confined to a “designated floodway.”(C) Where flows would inundate ordinarily dry areas in the bed of a terminal lake to a depth that floods dairies and other ongoing agricultural activities, or areas with substantial residential, commercial, or industrial development.(D) Flows occurring downstream of a dam that is releasing water for flood control purposes as required by a United States Army Corps of Engineers flood control rule or curve, a court judgment, or other binding rule, if those releases exceed the claims of all known legal users and may be diverted without injury to any lawful user of water water, are not being released for environmental protection purposes, and are diverted using existing points of diversion. This subparagraph does not apply to flows that do not present an imminent threat of flooding and inundation of lands, roads, or structures.(3) As used in this subdivision, “imminent” means a high degree of confidence that flooding and inundation will occur within 72 hours if flood management actions are not implemented.(4) As used in this section, “excess water conditions” are determined pursuant to the Agreement Between the United States of America and the State of California for Coordinated Operation of the Central Valley Project and the State Water Project, as amended.(b) The diversions cease when the flood conditions described in the public notice provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) have abated to the point there is no longer a risk of flooding and inundation of land, roads, or structures downstream of the point of diversion.(c) Any water diverted is not diverted to, and will not be applied to, any of the following:(1) Any barns, ponds, or lands where manure or waste from an animal facility that generates waste from the feeding and housing of animals for more than 45 days per year in a confined area that is not vegetated are applied.(2) Any agricultural field that has been identified as an outlier with respect to nitrogen application by any of the following:(A) The board.(B) The appropriate regional board.(C) An agricultural coalition charged with implementation of the Irrigated Lands Regulatory Program.(3) Any area that could cause damage to critical levees, infrastructure, wastewater and drinking water systems, drinking water wells or drinking water supplies, or exacerbate the threat of flood and other health and safety concerns.(4) Any area that has not been in active irrigated agricultural cultivation within the past three years, including grazing lands, annual grasslands, and natural habitats. This limitation does not apply to facilities already constructed for the purpose of groundwater recharge or managed wetlands.(d) (1) With respect to diversions from water tributaries to the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta (Delta), water rights holders are not making releases of stored water or reoperating facilities to provide flow for the purposes of meeting water quality control plan or endangered species requirements in the Delta at the time of the diversion.(2) For a diversion from the San Joaquin River or its tributaries upstream of Vernalis, water may be diverted only when the Delta is in excess water conditions and the Delta is without restrictions.(3) With respect to all other diversions from the Delta or its tributaries, water may be diverted only when the Delta is in excess water conditions and either of the following applies:(A) The Delta is without restrictions.(B) The Delta is with restrictions, but Delta operations are only controlled by Old and Middle River flow or San Joaquin River inflow-to-export ratio.(4) For diversions pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), the diverter shall monitor conditions daily using the Delta Operations Summary report published on the internet website of the department daily, or a successor to that internet website adopted by the department, to determine the Delta’s condition and whether diversions are authorized pursuant to the permit.(5) For purposes of paragraph (3), the term “controlled by Old and Middle River flow” means conditions when the Central Valley Project and the State Water Project are implementing one or more regulatory requirements by managing flows in Old and Middle River, whatever the source or content of those requirements is.(e) The diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge uses the following as part of the diversion:(1) Either existing diversion infrastructure or temporary pumps.(2) Existing groundwater recharge locations, where available.(3) No new permanent infrastructure or permanent construction.(4) For diversions directly from rivers or streams, protective screens on temporary pump intakes to minimize the impacts of diversion to fish and other aquatic life. Such screens shall be constructed of any rigid material, perforated, woven, or slotted, that provides water passage while physically excluding fish. The screen face shall be parallel to the flow and adjacent to the water’s edge. The upstream and downstream transitions to the screen structure shall be designed and constructed to minimize eddies upstream of, in front of, and downstream of the screen, while minimizing entrainment to the degree feasible. Before implementing this paragraph, the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall conduct at least one public workshop to review recommended design parameters and ranges of scenarios for deployment and use of protective screens. These recommendations and any other guidelines provided by the Department of Fish and Wildlife on the implementation of this paragraph shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(f) (1) Diversion for groundwater recharge pursuant to this section shall not create a vested water right to divert, even of a temporary nature. This limitation is on the authorization to divert and not a limitation on the authorization for beneficial use of the water diverted to underground storage.(2) In a groundwater basin being managed pursuant to a groundwater sustainability plan that the department has determined is likely to achieve the sustainability goal for the basin pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10733) of Part 2.74 of Division 6, including a determination pursuant to Section 10733, the groundwater sustainability agency may grant a person or entity making the diversion an allocation credit. The allocation credit granted by the groundwater sustainability agency shall not exceed the amounts of water reported in the filings required pursuant to subdivision (g).(g) (1) The person or entity making the diversion for groundwater recharge files all of the following with the board and with any applicable groundwater sustainability agency, as defined in Section 10721, for the basin:(A) A notice that provides the information specified in subparagraphs (A) through (C), inclusive, of paragraph (2), 48 hours before whenever feasible, and in no event later than 48 hours after initially commencing diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge.(B) A preliminary report no later than 14 days after initially commencing diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge.(C) A final report no later than 15 days after diversions cease.(2) The preliminary and final reports shall do all of the following:(A) Identify the person or entity making the diversion for groundwater recharge.(B) Provide the Global Positioning System (GPS) coordinates for the point of diversion, a map identifying the approximate area inundated by the floodflows, and the corresponding assessor parcel numbers.(C) Identify the time when diversions of floodflows to groundwater recharge commenced, and, for final reports, when diversions ceased.(D) Provide an estimate, as of the report’s date, of the amount of floodflows diverted for groundwater recharge.(h) (1) The diversion of floodflow for groundwater recharge pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, if the diversion does not otherwise require a discretionary permit and is carried out consistent with all requirements of this section, including no permanent construction. Notwithstanding any other law, and regardless of whether an action described in this subdivision is exempt from environmental review under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) or any other law, a lead agency shall provide notice to and consult with California Native American tribes in accordance with Sections 21074, 21080.3.1, 21080.3.2, 21082.3, 21084.2, and 21084.3 of the Public Resources Code before approving or carrying out an action described in this subdivision, and a decisionmaking authority may impose conditions of approval as part of the action to avoid or mitigate potential impacts to tribal cultural resources.(2) The person or entity making the diversion shall contact the Department of Fish and Wildlife to determine whether the Department of Fish and Wildlife has recommendations for appropriate species protection and shall consider implementing those recommendations to the extent possible during the diversion of floodflow. The Department of Fish and Wildlife’s recommendations, if any, shall be consistent with what is practicable during floodflow conditions.(i) This section shall apply only to diversions commenced before January 1, 2034.SEC. 3. Section 1242.2 of the Water Code is amended to read:1242.2. (a) The board shall post on its internet website all reports received pursuant to Section 1242.1.(b) On an annual basis, until January 1, 2029, 2034, the board shall compile information on the reports it receives pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1242.1 to identify the number of projects, estimated amount of water diverted and recharged, and locations of recharge projects implemented under this section and post this information on its internet website. The board may include recommendations to increase the amount of water diverted for recharge while protecting groundwater quality, public safety, and fish and wildlife resources in this annual report.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 1267 is added to the Water Code, immediately following Section 1266, to read:1267. (a) (1) For applications to divert water within or upstream of the Delta to underground storage pursuant to a minor application, as defined in Section 1348, a temporary urgency permit pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1425) of Chapter 6.5 of this part, or a temporary permit for diversion to underground storage pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433) of Chapter 6.5, the inclusion of the language from paragraphs (2) and (3) in the application as proposed permit terms, and its adoption in the applicable permit, shall satisfy the state board’s finding that water may be diverted and used without injury to the legal users of water from the Central Valley Project or the State Water Project, including the United States Bureau of Reclamation, the department, or any contractors to the projects.(2) For a diversion from the San Joaquin River or its tributaries upstream of Vernalis, water may be diverted only when the Delta is in excess water conditions and the Delta is without restrictions.(3) With respect to all other diversions from the Delta or its tributaries, water may be diverted only when the Delta is in excess water conditions and either of the following applies:(A) The Delta is without restrictions.(B) The Delta is with restrictions, but Delta operations are controlled only by Old and Middle River flow or San Joaquin River inflow-to-export ratio.(4) The permittee shall monitor conditions daily using the Delta Operations Summary report published on the internet website of the department daily, or a successor to that internet website adopted by the department, to determine the Delta’s condition and whether diversions are authorized pursuant to the permit.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), water may be diverted pursuant to the applicable permit if, in addition to compliance with other permit terms not related to Delta conditions, the permittee has an agreement with the department and, as necessary, the United States Bureau of Reclamation to ensure that the permittee’s diversions upstream of the Delta do not injure the department or the United States Bureau of Reclamation as a legal user of water by adversely impacting the operations of the State Water Project or the Central Valley Project.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a de minimis effect on the operations of the State Water Project or the Central Valley Project shall not be an injury to the department or the Bureau of Reclamation as a legal user of water.(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Controlled by Old and Middle River flow” means conditions when the Central Valley Project and the State Water Project are implementing one or more regulatory requirements by managing flows in Old and Middle River, whatever the source or content of those requirements is.(2) “De minimis effect” means a cumulative reduction of less than 10 acre-feet in a single water year.(3) “Delta” means the area defined in Section 12220.(4) “Delta is with restrictions” means conditions when the Central Valley Project and State Water Project operations in the Delta are constrained by any nondiscretionary requirement, including any requirement for the protection of water quality and endangered species.(5) “Delta is without restrictions” means conditions when Central Valley Project and State Water Project operations in the Delta are not constrained by any nondiscretionary requirements, including any requirements for the protection of water quality and endangered species.(6) “Delta operations” means the operations by which the Central Valley Project and the State Water Project divert water from the Delta.(7) “Excess water conditions” means conditions as determined pursuant to the Agreement Between the United States of America and the State of California for Coordinated Operation of the Central Valley Project and the State Water Project, as amended.(8) “Water year” means the period beginning on October 1 of one calendar year and continuing to September 30 of the following calendar year.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 1345 of the Water Code is amended to read:1345. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Division of Water Rights shall conduct a field investigation of all minor protested applications. The board shall notify the parties of the field investigation not less than 20 days before conducting the field investigation, to enable the parties to attend and present information to the board.(b) The Division of Water Rights is not required to conduct a field investigation for an application defined as a minor application pursuant to subdivision (b) paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1348 if either of the following conditions is met:(1) The Division of Water Rights determines, in its discretion, that a field investigation will not substantially expedite consideration of the application and a hearing should be conducted pursuant to Section 183. If the Division of Water Rights makes that determination, Sections 1346 and 1347 do not apply to the application.(2) The application involves a diversion pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) (2) of subdivision (b) (a) of Section 1348 and includes information on the applicant’s experience pursuant to past temporary permits, including all of the following:(A) Consistent with the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6), documentation of the consistency of the proposed diversion and recharge with the groundwater sustainability plan that applies to the area where the water was recharged.(B) Documentation showing the applicant took both of the following actions:(i) The applicant consulted with the Department of Fish and Wildlife concerning the diversion’s effects, if any, on fish, wildlife, and other instream beneficial uses.(ii) The applicant provided the Department of Fish and Wildlife a copy of the application.(C) Proposed terms that address potential effects on fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses identified through the applicant’s consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to subparagraph (B).(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 1345 is added to the Water Code, to read:1345. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Division of Water Rights shall conduct a field investigation of all minor protested applications. The board shall notify the parties of the field investigation not less than 20 days before conducting the field investigation, to enable the parties to attend and present information to the board.(b) The Division of Water Rights is not required to conduct a field investigation for an application defined as a minor application pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1348 if the Division of Water Rights determines, in its discretion, that a field investigation will not substantially expedite consideration of the application and a hearing should be conducted pursuant to Section 183. If the Division of Water Rights makes that determination, Sections 1346 and 1347 do not apply to the application.(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2037.SEC. 5.SEC. 7. Section 1347 of the Water Code is amended to read:1347. (a) Subject to subdivision (b) and based upon the field investigation and any other information obtained pursuant to this article, the Division of Water Rights shall issue a decision unless the board in its discretion determines that additional proceedings should be conducted pursuant to Section 183. A decision of the Division of Water Rights is subject to review as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1120) of Part 1.(b) For a minor application pursuant to subdivision (b) paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1348, the board shall consider that application as follows:(1) Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall give public notice of the application within 30 days of the filing of the application and allow 45 days from the date of the notice for the filing of comments on the application. The board may extend that time by up to 30 days if the board makes a written finding of good cause based on unique circumstances associated with the individual application.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall issue a decision on the application within 180 days of the deadline for submitting comments on the application. The board may delegate its authority to issue a decision on the application to the Division of Water Rights, subject to the board’s reconsideration of the division’s decision pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1122) of Chapter 4 of Part 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the board’s reconsideration proceeding shall conclude within 90 days of the filing of a petition for reconsideration and that period shall not be extended without the applicant’s consent.(3) The board shall approve the application if the board determines that a preponderance of the evidence shows both of the following:(A) The proposed diversion would not injure any legal user of water through significant changes in water quantity, water quality, timing of diversion or use, consumptive use of the water, or reduction in return flows.(B) The proposed diversion would not unreasonably affect fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses. To support the board in making this finding, the applicant shall consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife.(4) If the board determines that the preponderance of the evidence does not support the findings required by paragraph (3) based on the applicant’s proposed terms, the board shall, to the maximum extent possible based on the record, approve the application based on terms that the board determines will cause the applicant’s diversion to satisfy the provisions of paragraph (3). If the board nonetheless determines that the preponderance of the evidence cannot support making the findings required by paragraph (3), the board may deny the application. The board shall not condition any permit on any terms involving another permit, license, or water right held by the applicant or to avoid or mitigate impacts that are not caused by the diversion proposed by the application.(5) The board shall not require separate applications for consumptive and nonconsumptive uses of water that would be diverted pursuant to the application. Notwithstanding any other law, an application and resulting permit, that includes one or more recharge beneficial uses, sufficiently describes the place of use and the points of rediversion from groundwater if the application and resulting permit depicts the geographic area where recharge will occur without identifying specific wells.(6) (A) The board’s issuance of a permit pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code Code, unless the project did not undergo environmental review pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, if the permitted diversions will occur through either of the following:(i) Existing diversion infrastructure.(ii) Temporary facilities that meet both of the following conditions:(I) Do not require construction.(II) If they divert directly from a river or stream, the facilities have protective screens on their intakes to minimize the impacts of diversion to fish and other aquatic life, with those screens being constructed of any rigid materials, perforated, woven, or slotted, that provides water passage while physically excluding fish.(B) Notwithstanding any other law, and regardless of whether an action described in subparagraph (A) is exempt from environmental review under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) or any other law, a lead agency shall provide notice to and consult with California Native American tribes in accordance with Sections 21074, 21080.3.1, 21080.3.2, 21082.3, 21084.2, and 21084.3 of the Public Resources Code before approving or carrying out an action described in subparagraph (A), and a decisionmaking authority may impose conditions of approval as part of the action to avoid or mitigate potential impacts to tribal cultural resources.(7) Notwithstanding the board’s declaration that a stream reach is fully appropriated pursuant to Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 1205) of Chapter 1, the board may consider an application for diversions from that reach pursuant to this section if that reach is subject to an agreement or memorandum of understanding among water suppliers and nongovernmental organizations concerning the coequal goals of reliable water supplies and preservation of the reach’s environmental value.(8) In setting fees for applications pursuant to this section for purposes of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525), the board shall set those fees at a level to encourage those applications. The board shall not require separate applications or fees for consumptive and nonconsumptive uses of diverted water.(9) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2037.(c) On or before January 1, 2035, the board shall compile information on the permits issued and diversions conducted pursuant to subdivision (b), and post the information on its internet website. The board, in compiling this information, may utilize information that it already receives and posts on its internet website. The board may include recommendations in this report to increase the amount of water diverted for recharge while protecting groundwater quality, public safety, and fish and wildlife resources. The board may consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife in preparing the posted information.SEC. 6.SEC. 8. Section 1348 of the Water Code is amended to read:1348. (a) For purposes of this article, a minor application shall mean either of the following:(a)(1) Any application which that does not involve direct diversions in excess of three cubic-feet cubic feet per second or storage in excess of 200 acre-feet per year.(b)(2) An application by a groundwater sustainability agency or local agency, as defined in Section 10721, or a private entity pursuant to a memorandum of understanding or other agreement with a groundwater sustainability agency, for either of the following diversions:(1)(A) A diversion substantially similar to a diversion previously authorized by temporary permits for at least five years pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1425) of Chapter 6.5 and involving no greater amount of diversion, and no other points of diversion, than authorized in the last of the preceding temporary permits. permits, and where the temporary permit was subject to environmental review pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(2)(B) A diversion previously authorized by a temporary permit pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433) of Chapter 6.5.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 9. Section 1348 is added to the Water Code, to read:1348. For purposes of this article, a minor application shall mean either of the following:(a) Any application that does not involve direct diversions in excess of three cubic feet per second or storage in excess of 200 acre-feet per year.(b) An application by a groundwater sustainability agency or local agency, as defined in Section 10721, for a diversion previously authorized by a temporary permit pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433) of Chapter 6.5.(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2037.SEC. 7.SEC. 10. Article 1 (commencing with Section 1420) is added to Chapter 6.5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Water Code, to read: Article 1. General Provisions1420. This article applies to applications for temporary urgency permits pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1425) and for temporary permits for diversion to underground storage pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433). Notwithstanding any other law, for applications for permits that this article applies to, this article’s terms determine the availability of water for diversion.1421. Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:(a) “90/20 method” means the method for calculating water availability when flows exceed the 90th percentile of historic daily flow between December 1 and March 31, and the total amount of water diverted is capped at 20 percent of the daily flow after downstream senior diverter demand, established instream flow requirements, and consideration of water quality objectives are satisfied.(b) “Basin” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.(c) “Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.(d) “Diversion criteria” means specific thresholds that determine when water is available to divert, based on flows. Diversion criteria are in addition to any other conditions placed on a permit.(e) “Flood/recharge diversion criteria” means the method for calculating water availability for the Sacramento River and its tributaries upstream of the Delta, pursuant to which water is available for diversion for recharge and beneficial uses during the period of December 1 to March 31, inclusive, within a water year when, on the date of measurement, cumulative runoff as of that date exceeds the 80th percentile of historical cumulative water year runoff at the point of diversion, or the nearest measuring point, and lasting until that cumulative water year runoff is lower than the 50th percentile of historical cumulative runoff at the point of diversion, or the nearest point of measurement, as measured against historical cumulative water year runoff measured on that date. The total amount of water diverted shall be no greater than 20 percent of the daily flow after bypass of the California Environmental Flows Framework median wet season baseflow and after downstream senior diverter demand is satisfied.(f) “Groundwater sustainability agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.(g) “Groundwater sustainability plan” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.(h) “Local agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.(i) “Location-specific diversion criteria” means criteria for determining the water available for diversion pursuant to methods other than the 90/20 method or the flood/recharge diversion criteria that contain all of the following components:(1) Limits diversion to the December 1 to March 31, inclusive, period and from higher streamflows.(2) Limits diversions to a portion of daily or seasonal streamflow.(3) Downstream senior demand is satisfied.(4) Protects public trust resources.(5) Allows for implementation across the specific region.(6) Provides for the ability to efficiently forecast diversions, operate to diversion criteria, and promote maximum diversion opportunities pursuant to appropriate conditions.(j) “Major rim dam” means Shasta Dam, Oroville Dam, Folsom Dam, Englebright Dam, Camp Far West Dam, Indian Valley Dam, Cache Creek Dam, Black Butte Dam, and Monticello Dam.(k) “Recharge beneficial uses” means the recharge of water to groundwater for the nonconsumptive purpose of preventing or mitigating one or more undesirable results, as defined in Section 10721.(l) “Sustainability goal” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.(m) “Temporary permit” means a temporary urgency permit issued pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1425) or a temporary permit for diversion to underground storage issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433).1422. (a) In determining the availability of water for applications and permits that this article applies to, the board shall apply the following criteria:(1) The board shall apply the flood/recharge diversion criteria to permits for one or more diversions from the Sacramento River or a tributary to the Sacramento River upstream of the Delta, except that the flood/recharge diversion criteria shall not apply to an application for diversion from a river reach that is upstream of a major rim dam.(2) For other areas of the state, the board shall apply location-specific diversion criteria to the maximum extent possible, and shall apply the 90/20 method where it is not possible to use location-specific diversion criteria.(b) (1) The board shall adopt emergency regulations detailing the 90/20 method.(2) The board’s adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to paragraph (1), and any amendment to those regulations, shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law, as necessary, for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in effect until revised by the board.(c) Notwithstanding the board’s declaration that a stream reach is fully appropriated pursuant to Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 1205) of Chapter 1, the board may consider an application for diversions from that reach pursuant to this section if that reach is subject to an agreement or memorandum of understanding among water suppliers and nongovernmental organizations concerning the coequal goals of reliable water supplies and preservation of the reach’s environmental values.1423. (a) The requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code do not apply to the adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this article.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, and regardless of whether an action described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) is exempt from environmental review under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) or any other law, a lead agency shall provide notice to and consult with California Native American tribes in accordance with Sections 21074, 21080.3.1, 21080.3.2, 21082.3, 21084.2, and 21084.3 of the Public Resources Code before approving or carrying out an action described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), and a decisionmaking authority may impose conditions of approval as part of the action to avoid or mitigate potential impacts to tribal cultural resources.1424. This article shall apply only to applications submitted before January 1, 2037.SEC. 8.SEC. 11. The heading of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1425) of Chapter 6.5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Water Code is amended and renumbered to read: Article 1.5. 180-Day Temporary Urgency PermitsSEC. 9.SEC. 12. Section 1425 of the Water Code is amended to read:1425. (a) Any person, whether or not an applicant, permittee, or licensee pursuant to provisions of this division other than this article, who has an urgent need to divert and use water may apply for, and the board may issue, a conditional, temporary permit without complying with other procedures or provisions of this division, but subject to all requirements of this article.(b) Before issuing a permit pursuant to this article, the board shall make all of the following findings:(1) The applicant has an urgent need for the water proposed to be diverted and used.(2) The water may be diverted and used without injury to any lawful user of water.(3) The water may be diverted and used without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses. To support the board in making this finding, the applicant shall consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife.(4) The proposed diversion and use are in the public interest, including findings to support permit conditions imposed to ensure that the water is diverted and used in the public interest, without injury to any lawful user of water, without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, and other instream beneficial uses, and will support the application of water to one or more beneficial uses, which may include recharge beneficial uses.(c) “Urgent need,” for the purposes of this article, means either of the following:(1) The existence of circumstances from which the board may in its judgment conclude that the proposed temporary diversion and use is necessary to further the constitutional policy that the water resources of the state be put to beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable and that waste of water be prevented; except that the board shall not find an applicant’s need to be urgent if the board in its judgment concludes, if applicable, that the applicant has not exercised due diligence either in making application for a permit pursuant to provisions of this division other than this article, or in pursuing that application to permit.(2) In a basin that requires a groundwater sustainability plan pursuant to the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6), the application of a local agency, groundwater sustainability agency, or private entity operating pursuant to a memorandum of understanding or other agreement with a groundwater sustainability agency to divert and use water determined to be available pursuant to Section 1422 to augment the basin’s recharge in order to support implementation of the sustainability goal in that basin.(d) The board may delegate to any officer or employee of the board all or any of its functions pursuant to this article, as provided in Section 7.(e) A temporary permit issued pursuant to this section may authorize the diversions to be initiated after the date of the permit’s issuance, if the diversions pursuant to that permit are only authorized during the 180-day period after diversions commence. The applicant shall request approval of a delayed initiation period as part of the applicant’s initial filing of the application. When delayed initiation of diversion is authorized pursuant to this section, the permittee shall inform the board of commencing of diversion within 10 days of initiation of diversion pursuant to the temporary permit. The board shall maintain a list of notifications received on its internet website.(f) (1) The board’s issuance of a temporary permit to address an urgent need shall be exempt from the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, if the permitted diversions occur through either of the following:(A) Existing diversion infrastructure.(B) Temporary facilities that meet both of the following conditions:(i) Do not require construction.(ii) If the facilities divert directly from a river or stream, the facilities have protective screens on their intakes to minimize the impacts of diversions to fish and other aquatic life, with those screens being constructed of any rigid material, perforated, woven, or slotted, and provides water passage while physically excluding fish.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, and regardless of whether an action described in paragraph (1) is exempt from environmental review under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) or any other law, a lead agency shall provide notice to and consult with California Native American tribes in accordance with Sections 21074, 21080.3.1, 21080.3.2, 21082.3, 21084.2, and 21084.3 of the Public Resources Code before approving or carrying out an action described in paragraph (1), and a decisionmaking authority may impose conditions of approval as part of the action to avoid or mitigate potential impacts to tribal cultural resources.(g) In setting fees for applications pursuant to this section for purposes of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525), the board shall set those fees at a level that encourages those applications. The board shall not require separate applications or fees for consumptive and nonconsumptive uses of diverted water.(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 13. Section 1425 is added to the Water Code, to read:1425. (a) Any person, whether or not an applicant, permittee, or licensee pursuant to provisions of this division other than this article, who has an urgent need to divert and use water may apply for, and the board may issue, a conditional, temporary permit without complying with other procedures or provisions of this division, but subject to all requirements of this article.(b) Before issuing a permit pursuant to this article, the board shall make all of the following findings:(1) The applicant has an urgent need for the water proposed to be diverted and used.(2) The water may be diverted and used without injury to any lawful user of water.(3) The water may be diverted and used without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses.(4) The proposed diversion and use are in the public interest, including findings to support permit conditions imposed to ensure that the water is diverted and used in the public interest, without injury to any lawful user of water, and without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, and other instream beneficial uses.(c) “Urgent need,” for the purposes of this article, means the existence of circumstances from which the board may in its judgment conclude that the proposed temporary diversion and use is necessary to further the constitutional policy that the water resources of the state be put to beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable and that waste of water be prevented; except that the board shall not find an applicant’s need to be urgent if the board in its judgment concludes, if applicable, that the applicant has not exercised due diligence either (1) in making application for a permit pursuant to provisions of this division other than this article, or (2) in pursuing that application to permit.(d) The board may delegate to any officer or employee of the board all or any of its functions pursuant to this article, as provided in Section 7.(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2037.SEC. 10.SEC. 14. Section 1431.1 is added to the Water Code, immediately following Section 1431, to read:1431.1. (a) Applications pursuant to this article may be accepted for processing in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433) where the diversion is proposed on a stream or stream segment that Section 1422 applies to, and the applicant proposed to operate pursuant to the applicable diversion criteria.(b) A temporary permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) may authorize the diversion to be initiated more than 180 days after date of issuance, except that authorization to divert shall automatically expire five years after diversions pursuant to the permit commence. The applicant shall request approval of a delayed initiation period as part of the applicant’s initial filing of the application. Where delayed initiation of diversion is authorized pursuant to this section, the permittee shall inform the board of commencement of diversion within 10 days of initiation of diversion pursuant to the temporary permit. The board shall maintain a list of notifications received on its internet website.(c) The Chief Deputy Director of Water Rights may limit diversion under temporary permits issued pursuant to this section in favor of competing temporary permits based on, but not limited to, consideration of public interest.(d) Temporary permits issued pursuant to this section may be changed, upon request, including as to the locations of recharge or purposes of use consistent with this article.(e) This section shall apply only to applications submitted before January 1, 2037.SEC. 11.SEC. 15. The heading of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433) of Chapter 6.5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Water Code is amended to read: Article 2. Five-Year Temporary Permits for Diversion to Underground StorageSEC. 16. Section 1431.2 is added to the Water Code, immediately following Section 1431.1, to read:1431.2. On or before January 1, 2035, the board shall compile information on the permits issued and diversions conducted pursuant to this article and post the information on its internet website. The board, in compiling this information, may utilize information that it already receives and posts on its internet website. The board may include recommendations in this report to increase the amount of water diverted for recharge while protecting groundwater quality, public safety, and fish and wildlife resources. The board may consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife in preparing the posted information.SEC. 12.SEC. 17. Section 1433 of the Water Code is amended to read:1433. (a) This article shall not apply to diversions within the groundwater basins identified in paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) of, or subdivision (c) of, Section 10720.8.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 18. Section 1433 is added to the Water Code, to read:1433. (a) Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:(1) “Basin” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.(2) “Groundwater sustainability agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.(3) “Local agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.(b) This article shall not apply to diversions within the groundwater basins identified in paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) of, or subdivision (c) of, Section 10720.8.(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2037.SEC. 13.SEC. 19. Section 1433.1 of the Water Code is amended to read:1433.1. (a) A groundwater sustainability agency or a local agency, whether or not an applicant, permittee, or licensee pursuant to provisions of this division other than this article, may apply for, and the board may issue, a conditional temporary permit for diversion of surface water to underground storage for beneficial use that advances the sustainability goal of a groundwater basin under the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6), without complying with other procedures or provisions of this division, subject to all requirements of this article. An application may be filed pursuant to this article whether or not there is an adopted groundwater sustainability plan, an interim plan, or an alternative pursuant to Section 10733.6 for the basin.(b) Before issuing a permit pursuant to this article, the board shall make all of the following findings based upon a preponderance of the evidence:(1) The proposed diversion is to underground storage for beneficial use consistent with subdivision (a).(2) The water may be diverted and used without injury to any lawful user of water, including the user’s ability to meet water quality objectives. This finding may be satisfied by demonstrating both of the following:(A) The proposed diversion to underground storage will occur only when both of the following conditions are satisfied:(i) Flow in the source water body exceeds the claims of all known legal users who divert water downstream of the proposed point of diversion.(ii) Unregulated flow in the source water body will be sufficient below the proposed point of diversion to meet instream flow requirements and water quality objectives.(B) To prevent injury to existing legal users of water, storage and extraction from storage in the basin pursuant to the proposed permit will be subject to accounting methods and reporting requirements established by any of the following:(i) A groundwater sustainability plan.(ii) An interim plan.(iii) An alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6.(3) The water may be diverted and used without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses pursuant to this section or Section 1422. To support the board in making this finding, the applicant shall consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife. If the permit does not include a condition proposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1433.2, the board shall include in the findings an explanation of why the condition is not included, provided that if applicable, Section 1422 shall determine the water available for appropriation.(4) The proposed diversion and use are in the public interest, including findings to support permit conditions imposed to ensure that the water is diverted and used in the public interest.(5) If there is an adopted groundwater sustainability plan, an interim plan, or an alternative pursuant to Section 10733.6 for the basin, the proposed diversion to underground storage is consistent with that plan or alternative.(c) The board may delegate to any officer or employee of the board all or any of its functions pursuant to this article, as provided in Section 7.(d) (1) The board’s issuance of a permit pursuant to this article is exempt from the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, if the permitted diversions will occur through either of the following:(A) Existing diversion infrastructure.(B) Temporary facilities that meet both of the following conditions:(i) Do not require construction.(ii) If the facilities divert directly from a river or stream, the facilities have protective screens on their intakes to minimize the impacts of diversions to fish and other aquatic life, with those screens being constructed of any rigid material, perforated, woven, or slotted, and provides water passage while physically excluding fish.(2) The exemption in paragraph (1) from the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code shall not apply to a five-year temporary permit if the same project has been subject to a 180-day permit that did not undergo environmental review pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(2)(3) Notwithstanding any other law, and regardless of whether an action described in paragraph (1) is exempt from environmental review under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) or any other law, a lead agency shall provide notice to and consult with California Native American tribes in accordance with Sections 21074, 21080.3.1, 21080.3.2, 21082.3, 21084.2, and 21084.3 of the Public Resources Code before approving or carrying out an action described in paragraph (1), and a decisionmaking authority may impose conditions of approval as part of the action to avoid or mitigate potential impacts to tribal cultural resources.(e) In setting fees for applications pursuant to this section for purposes of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525), the board shall set those fees at a level that encourages those applications. The board shall not require separate applications or fees for consumptive and nonconsumptive uses of diverted water.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 20. Section 1433.1 is added to the Water Code, to read:1433.1. (a) A groundwater sustainability agency or a local agency, whether or not an applicant, permittee, or licensee pursuant to provisions of this division other than this article, may apply for, and the board may issue, a conditional temporary permit for diversion of surface water to underground storage for beneficial use that advances the sustainability goal of a groundwater basin under the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6), without complying with other procedures or provisions of this division, subject to all requirements of this article. An application may be filed under this article whether or not there is an adopted groundwater sustainability plan, an interim plan, or an alternative pursuant to Section 10733.6 for the basin.(b) Before issuing a permit pursuant to this article, the board shall make all of the following findings based upon a preponderance of the evidence:(1) The proposed diversion is to underground storage for beneficial use consistent with subdivision (a).(2) The water may be diverted and used without injury to any lawful user of water, including the user’s ability to meet water quality objectives. This finding may be satisfied by demonstrating both of the following:(A) The proposed diversion to underground storage will occur only when both of the following conditions are satisfied:(i) Flow in the source water body exceeds the claims of all known legal users who divert water downstream of the proposed point of diversion.(ii) Unregulated flow in the source water body will be sufficient below the proposed point of diversion to meet instream flow requirements and water quality objectives.(B) To prevent injury to existing legal users of water, storage and extraction from storage in the basin pursuant to the proposed permit will be subject to accounting methods and reporting requirements established by any of the following:(i) A groundwater sustainability plan.(ii) An interim plan.(iii) An alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6.(iv) The board, in applying conditions to the permit.(3) The water may be diverted and used without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses. If the permit does not include a condition proposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1433.2, the board shall include in the findings an explanation of why the condition is not included.(4) The proposed diversion and use are in the public interest, including findings to support permit conditions imposed to ensure that the water is diverted and used in the public interest.(5) If there is an adopted groundwater sustainability plan, an interim plan, or an alternative pursuant to Section 10733.6 for the basin, the proposed diversion to underground storage is consistent with that plan or alternative.(c) The board may delegate to any officer or employee of the board all or any of its functions pursuant to this article, as provided in Section 7.(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2037.SEC. 14.SEC. 21. Section 1433.2 of the Water Code is amended to read:1433.2. (a) The application for a temporary permit shall be completed in accordance with Section 1260 and shall be accompanied by any maps, drawings, and other data that may be required by the board.(b) (1) An applicant shall pay an application fee and, if a permit is issued, a permit fee, both in amounts calculated in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525).(2) In setting fees for applications pursuant to this section for purposes of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525), the board shall set those fees at a level that encourages those applications. The board shall not require separate applications or fees for consumptive and nonconsumptive uses of diverted water.(c) In addition to subdivisions (a) and (b), an application shall include all of the following:(1) Evidence that the applicant has completed any environmental review required by, or the project is exempt from, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code). To the extent funding is available, the board shall review and comment on any notice of preparation or draft environmental document for a project subject to approval pursuant to this article, and include in the board’s comments identification of any instream beneficial uses of waters of the state that may be affected by the project. This paragraph is not a limitation on the authority of the board pursuant to any other law.(2) A notification from the Department of Fish and Wildlife that the applicant has consulted with the Department of Fish and Wildlife at least 30 days before submission of the application. If the Department of Fish and Wildlife determines that it needs additional time for review, it may provide for a longer consultation period, not to exceed 60 days. The notification shall include a copy of any conditions proposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife.(3) One of the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C), a water availability analysis that quantifies, pursuant to a range of foreseeable hydrologic conditions, the amount of unappropriated water available considering all known legal users who divert water hydrologically connected to the proposed point of diversion, effects on beneficial uses, including instream beneficial uses, and the ability to meet water quality objectives.(B) A simplified water availability analysis, if the applicant proposes to divert water only when flow in the source water body exceeds an established or calculated flood stage, or if the applicant requests board consideration of a simplified water availability analysis before submittal of the application, and the deputy director finds that a simplified water availability analysis is sufficient for the board to make the findings required by subdivision (b) of Section 1433.1.(C) A demonstration that Section 1422 applies to the application.(4) A proposed accounting method for application of water diverted pursuant to the permit to beneficial use, including recharge beneficial uses, that is either of the following:(A) Certified to be consistent with the groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6 by the groundwater sustainability agency for the basin where the water is proposed to be stored or the local agency responsible for implementing the approved alternative.(B) If there is no applicable groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6, adequate to demonstrate beneficial use of water pursuant to the proposed permit and not inconsistent with the department’s standards in Section 356.2 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 22. Section 1433.2 is added to the Water Code, to read:1433.2. (a) The application for a temporary permit shall be completed in accordance with Section 1260 and shall be accompanied by any maps, drawings, and other data that may be required by the board.(b) (1) An applicant shall pay an application fee and, if a permit is issued, a permit fee, both in amounts calculated in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525).(2) Consistent with Section 3 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution and the board’s authority to set fees to promote the conservation and utilization of water resources in the public interest, the board may adopt reduced fees pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525) for applications, petitions, and permits under this article.(c) In addition to subdivisions (a) and (b), an application shall include all of the following:(1) Evidence that the applicant has completed any environmental review required by, or the project is exempt from, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code). To the extent funding is available, the board shall review and comment on any notice of preparation or draft environmental document for a project subject to approval pursuant to this article, and include in the board’s comments identification of any instream beneficial uses of waters of the state that may be affected by the project. This paragraph is not a limitation on the authority of the board pursuant to any other law.(2) A notification from the Department of Fish and Wildlife that the applicant has consulted with the Department of Fish and Wildlife at least 30 days before submission of the application. If the Department of Fish and Wildlife determines that it needs additional time for review, it may provide for a longer consultation period, not to exceed 60 days. The notification shall include a copy of any conditions proposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife.(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a water availability analysis that quantifies, pursuant to a range of foreseeable hydrologic conditions, the amount of unappropriated water available considering all known legal users who divert water hydrologically connected to the proposed point of diversion, effects on beneficial uses, including instream beneficial uses, and the ability to meet water quality objectives.(B) A simplified water availability analysis, if the applicant proposes to divert water only when flow in the source water body exceeds an established or calculated flood stage, or if the applicant requests board consideration of a simplified water availability analysis before submittal of the application, and the deputy director finds that a simplified water availability analysis is sufficient for the board to make the findings required by subdivision (b) of Section 1433.1.(4) A proposed accounting method for storage and extraction of water diverted under the permit that is either of the following:(A) Certified to be consistent with the groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6 by the groundwater sustainability agency for the basin where the water is proposed to be stored or the local agency responsible for implementing the approved alternative.(B) If there is no applicable groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6, adequate to demonstrate beneficial use of water pursuant to the proposed permit and not inconsistent with the department’s standards in Section 356.2 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2037.SEC. 23. Section 1433.7 is added to the Water Code, immediately following Section 1433.6, to read:1433.7. On or before January 1, 2035, the board shall compile information on the permits issued and diversions conducted pursuant to this article and post the information on its internet website. The board, in compiling this information, may utilize information that it already receives and posts on its internet website. The board may include recommendations in this report to increase the amount of water diverted for recharge while protecting groundwater quality, public safety, and fish and wildlife resources. The board may consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife in preparing the posted information.